North Carolina, session 2025, SB189.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 111.1 of the Charter of the City of Winston-Salem, being
Chapter 232 of the Private Laws of 1927, as amended by Section 10 of S.L. 2023-112 and Section
25 of S.L. 2024-45, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 111.1. Civil Service Board.
…
(c) Former employees of the city shall be eligible to serve as members of the Board
provided (i) they have been separated from city employment for a period of not less than seven
consecutive years prior to becoming members of the Board. Board and (ii) they separated in good
standing from city employment without a sustained conduct violation or disciplinary action,
particularly any violation or action that would make the former employee ineligible for rehire by
the city, as determined by the city. No person shall be eligible to serve as a member of the Board
if the person, directly or indirectly, through any corporation, partnership, or other entity, or
contract, subcontract, or otherwise benefits financially from a business relationship with the city
or if the person has an immediate family member or spouse of the immediate family member
who, directly or indirectly, through any corporation, partnership, or other entity, or contract,
subcontract, or otherwise benefits financially from a business relationship with the city. No
person shall engage or benefit, directly or indirectly, from any contractual work or employment
with the city for a period of not less than two years following the end of that person's term as a
member of the Board.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to appointments
to the City of Winston-Salem Civil Service Board on or after August 1, 2025.
*S189-v-1*